Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-605
Chief of police; powers.

The chief of police of a city of the metropolitan class shall have, in the discharge of his or her proper duties, like powers and be subject to like responsibilities as a county sheriff in similar cases.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. V, § 5, p. 497;

C.S.1922, § 3686;

C.S.1929, § 14-605;

R.S.1943, § 14-605;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 218.
July 21, 2022
The purpose of this section is to give chief of police the same powers and responsibilities to enforce the law as that given to sheriffs; it does not make the chief of police liable for the acts of policemen. Webber v. Andersen, 187 Neb. 9, 187 N.W.2d 290 (1971).

The chief of police has same duty as sheriff to interfere for prevention of public violation of the law. Moores v. State ex rel. Dunn, 71 Neb. 522, 99 N.W. 249 (1904).